California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
“Commission” means the California Winegrape Growers Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74824.1.

“Local commission” means any local commission created pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

74825.

“Grape concentrate” or “concentrate” means unfermented grape juice from which the major portion of the original water content has been removed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74826.

“Grape juice” or “juice” means unfermented crushed grapes without solids containing the major portion of the original water content.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74826.5.

“Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, association, or other entity doing business in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74827.

“Producer” and “grower” are synonymous and, unless otherwise specified pursuant to Section 74922.1, mean any person who produced and marketed winegrapes in the preceding marketing season in a quantity of more than 25 tons. Unless otherwise exempted, producer also includes any person who receives winegrapes as payment for the use of his or her property in the production of winegrapes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74828.

“Producer districts” shall consist of the following:

(a) District 1 consists of Lake, Solano, Mendocino, Sonoma, Marin, and Napa Counties.

(b) District 2 consists of the City and County of San Francisco, Santa Barbara, San Luis Obispo, Ventura, Monterey, San Benito, Santa Clara, Santa Cruz, Alameda, San Mateo, and Contra Costa Counties.

(c) District 3 consists of Butte, Colusa, Glenn, Sacramento, Shasta, Tehama, Yolo, Yuba, Trinity, Siskiyou, Modoc, Lassen, Plumas, Sierra, Sutter, Humboldt, and Del Norte Counties, and that portion of San Joaquin County north of State Highway 4.

(d) District 4 consists of Merced, Stanislaus, Mariposa, Calaveras, Amador, El Dorado, Placer, Nevada, and Tuolumne Counties, and that portion of San Joaquin County south of State Highway 4.

(e) District 5 consists of Fresno, Alpine, Mono, Inyo, and Madera Counties, and that portion of Kings and Tulare Counties north of Nevada Avenue (Avenue 192).

(f) District 6 consists of Kern County and that portion of Kings and Tulare Counties south of Nevada Avenue (Avenue 192).

(g) District 7 consists of Los Angeles, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, Imperial, and San Diego Counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74828.1.

“Producer region,” for the purpose of establishing and operating a local commission, shall consist of one or more grape crush report districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

74829.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74829.5.

“Handler” means any person engaged in the marketing of winegrapes or winegrape products that the person has produced, purchased, or acquired from a producer, or is marketing on behalf of a producer whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, processor, or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 868, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74830.

“High proof” means an alcoholic distillate or a mixture of distillates obtained from the fermented juice, mash, or wine of fresh winegrapes or from the residue thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74831.

“Market” means to sell, barter, trade, purchase, acquire, or otherwise distribute wine, winegrapes, or winegrape products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74832.

“Market development” includes, but is not limited to, trade promotion, public information, dissemination of information on health and social issues and other matters, and activities for the prevention, modification, or removal of trade barriers which restrict the free flow of winegrape products to market and may include the presentation of facts to state, federal, or foreign governmental agencies on matters which affect this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74833.

“Market research” means any investigation, development, analysis, or implementation of information relating to the marketing of winegrapes and winegrape products including, but not limited to, trade practices, consumer trends, promotion, sales, and advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74834.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning July 1 of any year and extending through June 30 of the following years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74835.

“Must” means a mixture of unfermented crushed grapes, solid grape particles, and grape juice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74835.5.

“Processing” means any processing of winegrapes for the purpose of making must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, winegrape products, or products thereof, including high proof brandy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 3.5.)
-------------------------------------------

74836.

“Production research” means research relating to the production and processing of winegrapes, including, but not limited to, the development of new winegrape products and uses for these products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74837.

“Vintner” means a winegrower, as defined in Section 23013 of the Business and Professions Code, who holds a winegrower’s license issued by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23300) of Division 9 of the Business and Professions Code, and who is engaged in producing must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including high proof and brandy by processing winegrapes or field crushed must.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74838.

“Wine” means the product obtained by the fermentation of winegrapes or juice therefrom, with or without addition or abstracting, and includes any product made from winegrapes which is defined as a wine and permitted under Part III (commencing with Section 5381) of Subchapter F of Chapter 51 of Title 26 of the United States Code, and in the statutes of this state and regulations issued thereunder defining wine produced from grapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74839.

“Winegrapes” means grapes produced in this state which are intended to be converted from their fresh form into grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, or products thereof, including, but not limited to, high proof and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74840.

“Winegrape products” include, but are not limited to, must, grape juice, grape concentrate, wine, high proof, and brandy produced from winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Winegrape Growers Commission [74861. - 74877.]

74861.

There is in state government, the California Winegrape Growers Commission. The commission shall be composed of 18 producers and one public member.

(a) Producers within District 7 shall elect one producer member, producers within Districts 2, 3, 4, and 6 shall each elect two producer members, producers within District 5 shall elect four producer members, and producers within District 1 shall elect five producer members to serve on the commission. Alternate producer members shall be elected in the same manner. Each producer member and alternate producer member shall be elected from the district in which he or she produces the greatest portion of his or her winegrape tonnage.

(b) The public member may be appointed to the commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the commission.

(c) The secretary, and other appropriate individuals as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74861.1.

There are, in state government, local commissions for producer regions. The producers in any producer region of this state may, pursuant to this chapter, establish a local commission composed of not less than five and not more than 10 producers and may include one public member. The provisions of this chapter that are applicable to the commission, except Sections 74828, 74861, 74862, 74867, 74871, 74922, 74923, 74926, 74927, 74928, and 74951, shall apply to any local commission established and certified as operative pursuant to this chapter regardless of the certification of the commission.

(a) A producer member who produces more than 25 tons of winegrapes in a producer region shall be eligible to serve on the local commission in that producer region.

(b) A public member may be appointed to the local commission by the secretary from nominees recommended by the local commission.

(c) The secretary, and other appropriate individuals as determined by the local commission, shall be ex officio members of the local commission.

(d) There may be an alternate member for each member of the local commission.

The name of a local commission shall contain the words “local commission” and shall identify the producer region represented by the local commission. No local commission shall use the term “California Winegrape Growers Commission” as part of its name.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74862.

Periodically, the number of producer members and their respective alternate members serving on the commission from any district shall be reapportioned in a manner that assures representation in accordance with the value of winegrapes produced in each district. However, no district shall have less than one member nor more than five members on the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74863.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make these corrections as required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions as required by the secretary has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Any action of the commission in violation of the written notice is without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(d) Upon service of the written notice, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74864.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74865.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall concur, refuse to concur, or request additional information from the commission within 15 working days from notification of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74866.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenditures incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary has acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for the payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74866.1.

(a) The secretary shall operate in the most efficient, cost-effective manner possible in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter.

(1) The secretary shall notify the local commissions of oversight activities and costs that will result in expenses reimbursable by the local commissions.

(2) The local commissions shall inform the secretary which of these activities they will engage in that require oversight and reimbursement of expenses.

(b) The secretary is not required to provide notification to the local commissions pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) if the secretary determines that omission of notification is necessary to protect the confidentiality of the parties with respect to any investigation into the activities of the employees of the commission or the actions of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74867.

Each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall have an alternate member to be elected in the same manner as the member. An alternate member shall, in the absence of the member of whom he or she is an alternate, serve in place of the member on the commission and have and be able to exercise all the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event of death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate shall serve as a member on the commission until a successor is elected and has qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74868.

Any producer member and his or her alternate member shall be a person, or an employee representing a producer, who has a financial interest in producing, or causing to be produced, winegrapes for market. The qualifications of producer members and alternate members shall be maintained during the entire term of office. No more than one member and his or her alternate members shall be employed by or connected in a proprietary capacity with the same producer. However, producer membership in an agricultural nonprofit cooperative association or trade organization shall not be considered employment or being in a proprietary capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74869.

The public member and his or her alternate member shall have all the rights, privileges, and powers of any other member of the commission. The public member shall not have any financial interest in the wine or winegrape industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74870.

The term of office of members and alternate members shall be for two years or until their successors have been elected and have qualified. However, of the first members of the commission, one-half of the producer members and their alternate members shall serve for one year, and one-half of the producer members and their alternate members shall serve for two years. The determination of the term of each member shall be made by lot. No member or alternate member shall serve more than four consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74871.

No less than 10 producer members, including alternate members when acting in place of the members, shall constitute a quorum of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74871.1.

Not less than one-half of the producer members of any local commission, including alternate members when acting in the place of the members, shall constitute a quorum of the local commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

74872.

The vote of a majority of the members, or alternate members when acting in the place of the members, present at the meeting at which there is a quorum shall constitute the act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74873.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared and created a corporate body. It shall have the power to sue and be sued, to contract and be contracted with, and to have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. It may adopt a corporate seal. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts, when authenticated, shall be admissible in evidence in all courts of the state and shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74874.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend meetings of the commission and any committee meetings of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74875.

No member of the commission or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission shall receive a salary. Each member of the commission, except ex officio government members, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission. This amount shall be paid for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission. Members shall also receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74876.

All funds received from the assessments levied pursuant to this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks which the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent or agents as it may designate. The agent or agents shall be bonded by a fidelity bond, executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in an amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74877.

(a) The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission.

(b) No member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission or for errors in judgment, mistakes or other acts, either of commission or omission, except for their own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. Liability is several and not joint, and no member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission is liable individually for the default, act, or omission of any other member, alternate member, or any employee or agent of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [74891. - 74908.]

74891.

The powers and duties of the commission shall include, but are not limited to, all of those contained in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74892.

The commission may adopt and from time to time alter, rescind, modify, and amend all proper and necessary bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including appeals from any bylaws, rules, regulations, operating procedures, or orders of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74893.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all actions and exercise all powers incidental to, in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, proper or advisable effectuation of this chapter, including, but not limited to, entering into contracts for services with public and private agencies which are deemed necessary by the commission to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74894.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74895.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter. If the person engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective action and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74896.

The commission may fix the compensation for all employees of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74897.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74898.

The commission may establish offices, incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary in the opinion of the commission for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74899.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings, which shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary. A summary of the audit shall be made a part of an annual report to all producers, copies of which shall also be submitted to the Legislature and the department. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74900.

The commission may engage in market development and market research through plans and programs to enhance the sale of California winegrapes and winegrape products for the purpose of maintaining existing markets and creating new and larger domestic and foreign markets, and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the uses and value of California winegrapes and winegrape products. However, any plans and programs so developed and conducted shall not be directed towards a particular private brand or trade name, although private brands and trade names may be used in wine tastings and other similar programs authorized by the commission. In addition, the plans and programs shall make no use of false or unwarranted claims on behalf of California winegrapes or winegrape products, nor disparage the quality, value, sale, or use of any commodity. The commission shall not engage in collective bargaining issues, supply control, grades and quality standards, or price setting activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74900.1.

Persons subject to any local commission established after January 1, 1993, may designate the manner in which assessments that he or she pays to the local commission may be used, including for market development, market research, or production research, or a combination thereof. Persons may so designate during a period specified by the local commission following its establishment, and following any referendums conducted pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 74991).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74901.

The commission may accept contributions of, or match, private, local, state, or federal funds and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or local, state or federal agencies for purposes of maintaining, promoting, and enhancing the winegrape industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 587, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

74901.5.

The commission may present facts to, and negotiate with, local, state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters that affect the winegrape industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 587, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

74902.

The commission may undertake appropriate research relating to the production and processing of winegrapes, including the development of new winegrape products and uses for these products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74903.

The commission may publish and distribute bulletins or other communications relating to the California winegrape industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74904.

The commission may establish an assessment rate to defray operating costs of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74905.

The commission may establish an annual budget according to accepted accounting practices. The budget shall be concurred in by the secretary prior to disbursement of funds, except for disbursements made pursuant to Section 74896.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74906.

The commission shall submit to the secretary, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 63.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74907.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74908.

The secretary may require that any contract to which the commission is a party be submitted to the secretary for concurrence prior to the commission entering into the contract. If the secretary requires the submission of a contract and does not concur in that contract, the secretary shall hold a public hearing within 14 days of the initial decision not to concur. In the notice of the hearing, the secretary shall present a written explanation of his or her decision. The secretary shall make a final decision on whether or not to concur in the contract within 30 days of the hearing. The contract may not be executed from the time that the secretary makes the initial decision not to concur to the time of the final decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 64.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [74921. - 74929.]

74921.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum, shall not become operative until the secretary finds, in a referendum conducted by him or her, or a person designated by the secretary, that a favorable vote has been given pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74922.

(a) Upon receipt of a petition that the secretary determines is acceptable, the secretary shall establish a list of producers who are eligible to vote to establish the commission. In establishing the list, the secretary may require producers, vintners, county agricultural commissioners, and others to submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the quantity of winegrapes sold to vintners and the quantity of winegrapes processed by vintners or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum. The request for this information shall be in writing. The information required by the secretary shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

(b) Any producer whose name does not appear on the secretary’s list may have his or her name included on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer. Failure to be on the list does not exempt any producer from paying assessments under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 66.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74922.1.

(a) Upon petition of at least three producers from any one producer region of this state, the secretary shall establish a list of producers who are eligible to vote in a referendum to establish a local commission in that producer region. In establishing the list, the secretary may require the producers signing the petition and producers, vintners, county agricultural commissioners, and others to submit the names and mailing addresses of all producers in that producer region. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the quantity of winegrapes sold to vintners and the quantity of winegrapes processed by vintners from that producer region and the names and addresses of the vintners, or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum. The request for this information shall be in writing. The information required by the secretary shall be filed within 30 days following receipt of the written notice.

(b) Any producer whose name does not appear on the secretary’s list may have his or her name included on the appropriate list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer of a given producer region. Failure to be on the appropriate list does not exempt any producer from paying assessments under this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the petition may designate producers exempt from this chapter, but no producer shall be exempt who has produced and marketed more than 25 tons of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74922.5.

For the purpose of voting in the referendum required in Section 74921, only a person who would be required to pay the assessment as a producer pursuant to Section 74952.5 shall be considered a producer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 8, Sec. 10.   Effective March 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

74923.

In determining whether this chapter is applicable to growers, the secretary shall find that at least 40 percent of the total number of growers from the list established by the secretary participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the growers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the growers so voting marketed a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the growers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of this chapter, and the growers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74923.1.

In determining whether this chapter is applicable to growers in a producer region, the secretary shall find that at least 40 percent of the total number of growers from the list established by the secretary for the producer region participated in the referendum, and that either one of the following has occurred:

(a) Sixty-five percent or more of the growers in the producer region who voted in the referendum voted in favor of the local commission, and the growers so voting marketed a majority of the volume of winegrapes in the producer region in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(b) A majority of the growers in the producer region who voted in the referendum voted in favor of the local commission, and the growers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the volume of winegrapes in the producer region in the preceding marketing season, or in the current marketing season if the harvest is completed prior to the vote, by all the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74924.

The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration, and may prescribe additional procedures to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period. However, the total referendum period may not exceed 60 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74925.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74926.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given to the establishment of the commission as provided in this chapter, the secretary shall so certify and declare that result. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given as provided in this chapter, he or she shall so certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all producers and vintners whose names and addresses may be on file with the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74926.1.

If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given to the establishment of any local commission as provided in this chapter, the secretary shall so certify and declare that result. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, the secretary shall so certify and give notice of the favorable vote to all producers whose names and addresses may be on file with the secretary. If this chapter is certified as establishing the commission, any local commission shall be abolished unless its producers vote by referendum pursuant to Section 74923.1 in favor of that local commission remaining in operation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74927.

The petition to establish the commission shall name the persons designated to serve as producer members and their alternate members in the event the commission is approved by referendum. Upon the certification of the establishment of the commission, the producer members and their alternates named in the petition shall become the initial members and alternate members of the commission.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

74927.1.

The petition to establish a local commission shall name the persons designated to serve as producer members and their alternate members, if any, in the event that local commission is approved by referendum. Upon certification of the establishment of a local commission, the producer members and their alternates named in the petition shall become the initial members and alternate members of the local commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

74928.

Subsequent to the action taken pursuant to Section 74927, persons to be elected to the commission upon expiration of existing terms shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74928.1.

Subsequent to the action taken pursuant to Section 74927.1, persons to be elected to a local commission shall be selected pursuant to the nomination and election procedures established by the local commission with the concurrence of the secretary.
